Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
PART 1 General Provisions
27-3-24.
Restrictions on hunting feral hogs.

It shall be unlawful to hunt, or engage in the hunting of, feral hogs:

Upon the lands of another or enter upon the lands of another in pursuit of feral hogs without first obtaining permission from the landowner or lessee of such land or the lessee of the game rights of such land;

Upon any land which is posted without having the permission required by paragraph (1) of this subsection in writing and carried upon the person; or

During the firearms deer season unless the hunter and each person accompanying the hunter are wearing a total of at least 500 square inches of daylight fluorescent orange material as an outer garment and such material or garment is worn above the waistline, and may include a head covering.

(a.1) (1)

The board may by rule or regulation restrict the feeding, baiting, or hunting of feral hogs upon, over, around, or near feed or bait in any county wherein there is a documented occurrence of a communicable disease in deer and in any county adjoining such county. Such restriction may be imposed in such county and any adjoining county for a period of up to and including one year and may be extended for additional periods of up to and including two years each upon documentation that the communicable disease is still present in deer in such county. No person shall feed, bait, or hunt feral hogs in violation of any restriction imposed pursuant to this paragraph.

(a.2)

Nothing in this Code section shall prohibit any person from placing, exposing, depositing, distributing, or scattering any corn, wheat, or other grains, salts, apples, or other feed or bait so as to constitute a lure, attraction, or enticement for feral hogs; provided, however, that any such lure, attraction, or enticement shall not be placed, exposed, deposited, distributed, or scattered so as to cause hunting any species of wildlife on any adjoining property to be prohibited under this Code section.

It shall be unlawful to transport any live feral hog without carrying on his or her person a feral hog transport permit issued by the Department of Agriculture pursuant to Code Section 2-7-201. Any person who captures live feral hogs without such permit shall kill such feral hogs prior to transport from the point of capture.

The Board of Natural Resources is authorized by rules or regulations to control and regulate the hunting or taking of feral hogs on wildlife management areas.

(2)

The department shall give notice of such restriction by mail or electronic means to each person holding a current license to hunt whose last known address is within a restricted county. The department may place or designate the placement of signs and markers so as to give notice of such restriction.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-3-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 568, § 3; Ga. L. 2009, p. 48, § 2/SB 111; Ga. L. 2011, p. 249, § 2/HB 277; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1352, § 8/HB 475; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 6/SB 72.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, rewrote subsection (a.2), which read: “It shall be unlawful for any person to place, expose, deposit, distribute, or scatter any corn, wheat, or other grains, salts, apples, or other feed or bait so as to constitute a lure, attraction, or enticement for feral hogs within 50 yards of any property ownership boundary.”

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, “subsection” was substituted for “Code section” in paragraph (a)(2).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 1352, § 1/HB 475, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Feral Hog Control Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 1352, § 2/HB 475, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly finds that feral hogs are an invasive species in Georgia and are detrimental to the natural resources and agricultural production of the state.
Feral hogs cause significant damage to crops and wildlife habitat.
In addition, as carriers of communicable diseases, feral hogs pose a health risk to humans, livestock, companion animals, pets, and native wildlife.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 181 (2011).

For article, “Game and Fish:
Wildlife Generally,” see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 181 (2011).

27-3-25.
Hunting bears; required outer garments.

It shall be unlawful for any person to hunt bears or for any person to accompany another person hunting bears unless each person shall wear a total of at least 500 square inches of daylight fluorescent orange material as an outer garment during firearms and primitive weapons seasons. Such clothing must be worn above the waistline and may include a head covering.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-3-25

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 842, § 5; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1013, § 13.

27-3-26.
Hunting bears; restrictions; penalties.

It shall be unlawful for any person to:

Hunt, take, or attempt to take a bear except during the open season for hunting and taking bears or under authority of a permit by the Department of Natural Resources to kill or take a bear;

Buy, sell, barter, or exchange a bear or bear part; or

Possess or transport a freshly killed bear or bear part except during the open season for hunting and taking bears and except as provided in Code Section 27-3-28.

Each act constituting a violation of this Code section is a separate offense.

Any person violating the provisions of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature, and, upon conviction, may be punished by a fine of not less than $500.00 nor more than $5,000.00, by confinement for a term not to exceed 12 months, or both. The court may order that restitution be paid to the department of not less than $1,500.00 for each bear or bear part which is the subject of a violation of this Code section. Any equipment which is used or intended for use in a violation of this Code section, excluding motor vehicles, is declared to be contraband and is forfeited in accordance with the procedures set forth in Chapter 16 of Title 9. The hunting and fishing privileges of any person convicted of violating the provisions of this Code section shall be suspended for three years.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-3-26

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1157, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2391, § 6; Ga. L. 2010, p. 952, § 6/SB 474; Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-19/HB 233.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, “$500.00” was substituted for “$500” in subsection (c).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 4-1/HB 233, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2015, and shall apply to seizures of property for forfeiture that occur on or after that date.
Any such seizure that occurs before July 1, 2015, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such seizure.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2015).

27-3-27.
Unlawful use of bear bait.

It is unlawful to use any type of bait to concentrate the bear population in any area or to lure them to any location which gives or might give a hunter an unnatural advantage when hunting bear.

Any person violating the provisions of this Code section is guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature and, upon conviction, may be punished by a fine of not less than $500.00 and not to exceed $5,000.00 or by confinement for a term not to exceed 12 months, or both.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-3-27

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1157, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2391, § 7; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 27.

27-3-28.
Person may take possession of native wildlife which has been killed by a motor vehicle.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, any person may lawfully possess native wildlife which has been accidentally killed by a motor vehicle. The following exceptions and conditions to this general rule shall apply:

Any person taking possession of a bear accidentally killed by a motor vehicle shall notify the department or a law enforcement officer of the fact and location of the taking of possession and his or her name and address within 48 hours after taking possession of the bear; and

This Code section shall not authorize any person to take possession of any animal of a species designated as a protected species under Article 5 of this chapter or under federal law.

A law enforcement officer receiving a report of a person taking possession of a bear under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall in turn transmit the reported information to the department within 48 hours after receipt of such information.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-3-28

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 952, § 7/SB 474.

27-3-29.
Recording and reporting requirements for game animals and birds; penalty for violations.

The board shall promulgate rules and regulations establishing harvest recording and reporting requirements for game animals and game birds. Such rules and regulations shall describe the type of information that is required, the requirements for transportation of the carcass of a game animal or game bird killed by another person, and the requirements for possession of the carcass of a game animal or game bird by any private or commercial cold storage or processing facility.

Except in compliance with all applicable rules and regulations of the board regarding required harvest recording and reporting, it shall be unlawful for:

Any person killing a game animal or game bird to remove the carcass from the place of killing or for any person to transport the carcass of a game animal or game bird killed by another person; or

Any private or commercial cold storage or processing facility to possess the carcass of a game animal or game bird.

It shall be unlawful to obtain, possess, or otherwise use multiple sets of licenses or harvest records for the purpose of circumventing the bag limit for any game animal or game bird for which a harvest record is required by the rules and regulations of the board.

Any person violating the provisions of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than $200.00 or by imprisonment for not more than 30 days, or both.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-3-29

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 1056, § 1/SB 112.